Hawaii statutes.
[§466D-4] Physician supervision
required. No person shall practice respiratory care under this chapter
except under the direct order and qualified medical direction of a physician or
osteopathic physician licensed pursuant to chapter 453. [L 2010, c 178, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next